udm.aff
FLAG long
# таӵе кылъёслы: пель-ы, син-мы, ныр-ы, ки-ы, мылкыд-ы, лул-ы, тусбуй-ыз, вылтыр-ы, ныд-ыз, ныл-ы, вын-ыд
SFX N4 Y 450 		 
SFX N4 0 ы [^и][^н]
SFX N4 0 ыд .
SFX N4 0 ыз .
SFX N4 0 мы .
SFX N4 0 эз [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N4 0 ез [^дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N4 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 ме . #1лицо	 вин.п.
SFX N4 0 мес . 
SFX N4 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]  #2л.
SFX N4 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N4 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N4 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX N4 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N4 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N4 0 лэн . 		#род.п.
SFX N4 0 ылэн .
SFX N4 0 ыдлэн .
SFX N4 0 ызлэн .
SFX N4 0 мылэн .
SFX N4 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 лэсь . 	# разд.п.
SFX N4 0 лэсьсэ .
SFX N4 0 ылэсь .
SFX N4 0 ыдлэсь .
SFX N4 0 ызлэсь .
SFX N4 0 мылэсь .
SFX N4 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 лы .		 # дат.п.
SFX N4 0 ылы .
SFX N4 0 ыдлы .
SFX N4 0 ызлы .
SFX N4 0 мылы .
SFX N4 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 тэк . #лиш.п.
SFX N4 0 ытэк .
SFX N4 0 ыдтэк .
SFX N4 0 ызтэк .
SFX N4 0 мытэк .
SFX N4 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 ъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь] #соотв.п.
SFX N4 0 я [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь]
SFX N4 0 ыя .
SFX N4 0 ыдъя .
SFX N4 0 ызъя .
SFX N4 0 мыя .
SFX N4 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 ын . #твор.п. + местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX N4 0 ыным .
SFX N4 0 ынымы .
SFX N4 0 ыныд .
SFX N4 0 ыныды .
SFX N4 0 ыныз .
SFX N4 0 ынызы .	
SFX N4 0 ам [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 амы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 ад [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 ады [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 аз [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 азы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 ям [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 ямы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 яд [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 яды [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 яз [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 0 язы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N4 ь ям ь
SFX N4 ь ямы ь
SFX N4 ь яд ь
SFX N4 ь яды ь
SFX N4 ь яз ь
SFX N4 ь язы ь
SFX N4 0 ысь . #исходн.п.
SFX N4 0 ысьтым .
SFX N4 0 ысьтымы .
SFX N4 0 ысьтыд .
SFX N4 0 ысьтыды .
SFX N4 0 ысьтыз .
SFX N4 0 ысьтызы .
SFX N4 0 ысьсэ . #-ысьсэ
SFX N4 0 ысен . #отдал.п.
SFX N4 0 ысеным .
SFX N4 0 ысенымы .
SFX N4 0 ысеныд .
SFX N4 0 ысеныды .
SFX N4 0 ысеныз .
SFX N4 0 ысенызы .
SFX N4 0 ысез . #-ысез
SFX N4 0 тӥ . 
SFX N4 0 тӥм .
SFX N4 0 тӥмы .
SFX N4 0 тӥд .
SFX N4 0 тӥды .
SFX N4 0 тӥз .
SFX N4 0 тӥзы .
SFX N4 0 лань . #направ.п.
SFX N4 0 ылань .
SFX N4 0 ыдлань .
SFX N4 0 ызлань .
SFX N4 0 мылань .
SFX N4 0 тылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 дылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 сылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 зылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N4 0 озь [^ь] #предельн.п.
SFX N4 ь ёзь [ь]
SFX N4 0 озям .
SFX N4 0 озяд .
SFX N4 0 озяз .
SFX N4 0 мыозь .
SFX N4 0 дыозь .
SFX N4 0 зыозь .
SFX N4 0 ъёс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ос [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёс [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыд [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # вин.п.
SFX N4 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсме [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмес [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстэ [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстэс [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссэ [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссэс [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёслэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # род.п.
SFX N4 0 ослэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёслэн [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыдлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсызлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыдлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осызлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсылэн [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыдлэн [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсызлэн [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмылэн [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстылэн [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссылэн [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёслэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # разд.п.
SFX N4 0 ослэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёслэсь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыдлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсызлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыдлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осызлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыдлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсызлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёслы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # дат.п.
SFX N4 0 ослы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёслы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыдлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсызлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыдлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осызлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсылы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыдлы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсызлы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмылы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстылы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссылы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # лиш.п.
SFX N4 0 остэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёстэк [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыдтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсызтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыдтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осызтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсытэк [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыдтэк [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсызтэк [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмытэк [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстытэк [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссытэк [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # соотв.п.
SFX N4 0 осъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсъя [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыдъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсызъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыдъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осызъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсыя [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыдъя [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсызъя [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмыя [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстыя [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссыя [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсын [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX N4 0 осын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсын [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п.
SFX N4 0 ъёсынымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсынызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осыным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осынымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
