udm.dic
огпал/A1A2N4
палдур/A1A2N4
сьӧр/A1A2N4
бер/B1D1N4
кай/I1N4
мукет/M1N4A1A2
азь/N2A1A2N4
амал/N4
асдун/N4
атайним/N4
бам/N2N4
бубыним/N4
бурд/N4
быж/N4
вандэттус/N4
визьбур/N4
вирсэр/N4
вӧй/N4
вужер/N4
выл/N4
вылбам/N4
дакыл/N4
дӥнь/N4
дун/N4
дур/N4
зын/N4A1A2D1
йӧл/N4A1A2
йӧн/N2N4A1A2D1
йыл/N4
йыразь/N4
каб/N4
кӧбер/N4
кӧй/N4A1A2D1
кук/N4
кыд/N4
кыдбер/N4
кынар/N4
лыд/N4
мыд/A2A2N4
нимтул/N4
нунал/N2N4
пуд/N4
пум/N2N4
пыдес/N2N4A1A2
пыдкук/N4
синкаш/N4
сӥныр/N4
сӧзул/N4
сюр/N4
улазь/N4
ӵын/N4
шӧй/N4
ымдур/N4
вир/N4A1A2
вылтус/N4
вылтыр/N4
вын/N4
инбам/N4
йыр/N4A1A2
ки/N4
кибам/N4
кузпал/N4
кыл/N4
лул/N4
мугор/N4
мыл/N4
мылкыд/N4
ним/N4
ныд/N4
ныл/N4A1A2
ныр/N4A1A2
сям/N4
тус/N4
тусбуй/N4
тыбыр/N4A1A2
шӧм/N4
шор/N4A1A2
ым/N4
ымныр/N4
ӧд/W1N4
